Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,129
Tax Commissioner; tax; deficiency; collection.

The Tax Commissioner may collect a deficiency notwithstanding that an application for review in respect of such deficiency has been made by the taxpayer, unless the taxpayer at or before the time his application for review is made, has paid the deficiency, or has deposited with the Tax Commissioner the amount of the deficiency or has filed with the Tax Commissioner a bond, in the amount of the deficiency being contested including interest and other amounts as well as all costs and charges which may accrue against him in the prosecution of the proceeding and issued by a person authorized under the laws of this state to act as surety, conditioned upon the payment of the deficiency including interest and other amounts as finally determined and such costs and charges.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 129, p. 1634.